District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-611.07

Executive pay plan.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1107, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 1, 1985, D.C. Law 6-15, § 7(d), 32 DCR 3570
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 304(d), 44 DCR 1423
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(n)(4), 45 DCR 2464
Commissioner of insurance and securities, rate of pay, see § 31-104.
1981 Ed., § 1-612.7.
1973 Ed., § 1-341.7.
Applicability of § 101(n) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-611.02.